Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6039HH (3) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2376 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES. There 1 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 2 department of health and human services for the fiscal year 3 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 4 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 5 purposes designated: 6 To expand the Iowa return to community program: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 8 The department shall submit a report to the governor and the 9 general assembly on or before December 31, 2027, regarding the 10 outcomes of the additional investment in the Iowa return to 11 community program provided in this section. 12 Sec. 2. REIMBURSEMENT RATES. Reimbursement for medical 13 assistance, state supplementary assistance, and social service 14 providers and services reimbursed under the purview of the 15 department of health and human services shall remain at the 16 reimbursement rate in effect on June 30, 2026, or shall be 17 determined pursuant to the reimbursement methodology in effect 18 on June 30, 2026, with the exception of the following: 19 1. If reimbursement is otherwise negotiated by contract or 20 pursuant to an updated fee schedule. 21 2. Reimbursement for adult day care services provided under 22 a home and community-based services waiver shall be increased 23 by five percent. 24